Missouri, session 2026, HB1840.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.412, RSMo, is repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 161.412, 209.247, 301.287, and 650.535, to read as follows:
161.412. 1. Subject to appropriations, the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard
of hearing shall provide grants to:
(1) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind children and their families.
Such services may include providing family support advocates to assist deaf-blind children in
participating in their communities and family education specialists to teach parents and
siblings skills to support the deaf-blind children in their family;
(2) Organizations that provide services for deaf-blind adults. Such grants shall be
used to provide assistance to deaf-blind adults who are working towards establishing and
maintaining independence; and
(3) Organizations that train support service providers. Such grants shall be used to
provide training that will lead to certification of support service providers in Missouri.
2. The commission shall use a request-for-proposal process to award the grants in this
section. Organizations that receive grants under this section may expend the grant for any
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 2
purpose authorized in this section. [The total amount of grants provided under this section
shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars annually.]
209.247. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of hearing;
(2) "Communication access services", shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) Qualified interpreters, as described in section 209.285;
(b) Communication access realtime translation services;
(c) Notetakers, visual or Braille boards, and visual video services;
(d) Open and closed captioning services;
(e) Environmental access support for the deaf-blind and those with low vision;
and
(f) Any other effective method of making aurally delivered and printed
information available to individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing;
(3) "Communication access service provider", an individual who is trained to
offer a communication access service to communicate aurally delivered and printed
information to individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing.
2. The commission shall establish a statewide communication access services
program to improve compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act for
agencies and businesses by coordinating resources, filling service gaps, and assisting
with costs related to accommodations. The commission shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a statewide registry of communication access service
providers, organized by region, including rural and urban areas;
(2) Create a process for communication access service providers to apply for
placement on the registry;
(3) Establish minimum standards for training, equipment, and technology;
(4) Maintain an informational website accessible by businesses, agencies, and
individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing regarding resources and
available programming;
(5) Provide consultation, training, and technical assistance to aid state and local
agencies to be in compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(6) Provide information regarding available resources to assist with compliance
costs and to support potential communication access service providers in underserved
areas;
(7) Conduct outreach activities for urban or rural residents and communication
access service providers to expand awareness and capacity in underserved areas;

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 3
(8) Subject to appropriation, administer scholarships for professional
development, internships, and certification testing;
(9) Subject to appropriation and pursuant to rules promulgated under this
section, administer and finance requests for communication access services between
agencies and businesses and individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing;
(10) Hire a program manager to serve at the pleasure of the director of the
commission. The program manager shall have a background and experience in
communication access services. The salary for the program manager shall be paid out
of the fund established in subsection 3 of this section; and
(11) Submit an annual report to the governor and the general assembly that
includes information on communication access service utilization, registry effectiveness,
funding outcomes, and recommendations for improvement.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Communication Access
Services Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund and any gifts,
donations, grants, and bequests from individuals, private organizations, foundations, or
other sources for the purpose of administering the program established in this section.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used by the
commission for the salary of the program manager, distribution of financial assistance
for communication access services, and distribution of scholarships under this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section, including the process for distributing scholarships under subdivision (8) of
subsection 2 of this section and determining eligibility for financial assistance under
subdivision (9) of subsection 2 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 4
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
301.287. 1. This section shall be known and referred to as "Mason's Law".
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, a resident of this state with a health condition or
disability that limits or impairs the ability to effectively communicate with law
enforcement may, at any time, apply to the department of revenue for a designation that
shall be associated with the person's motor vehicle license plate number and available to
law enforcement under the Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES)
established under chapter 43.
3. The initial application, which shall be on a form prescribed by the department
and made available on the department's website, shall by signed by a physician licensed
under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under chapter 337, certifying that:
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse has a physical or
mental health condition that is likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate
with law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that the applicant or the
applicant's child, parent, or spouse will have the communication impairment for at least
five years.
4. Upon submission of an application and approval by the department, the
department shall notify the Missouri state highway patrol of the resident's approved
application and the highway patrol shall prepare an entry in the Missouri uniform law
enforcement system (MULES) that indicates that the applicant or the applicant's child,
parent, or spouse has a physical or mental health condition that may impair the ability
to effectively communicate with law enforcement. Such entry shall remain active for a
period of five years, unless the applicant requests that such designation be removed
from the system. Upon expiration of the five-year period, the designation in MULES
may be reactivated upon the filing of a renewal form with the department signed by a
physician licensed under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under chapter 337,
certifying that:
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse has a physical or
mental health condition that is likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate
with law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that the applicant or the
applicant's child, parent, or spouse will have the communication impairment for at least
five years.

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 5
5. The department of public safety shall issue guidance and education materials
to all law enforcement agencies in this state to promote awareness of the designation
established under this section.
6. The department of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
650.535. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "RJ's Law".
2. There is hereby created within the department of public safety a statewide
program called the "Purple Alert System" to aid in the identification and location,
through immediate and effective community and emergency response, of missing
persons with developmental disabilities whose disappearance poses a credible threat of
immediate danger or serious bodily harm to the missing persons and who are believed to
be unable to return to safety without assistance.
3. For purposes of this section, "developmental disability" includes the
following:
(1) A mental or cognitive disability, which shall not include, for persons sixty
years of age or older, Alzheimer's disease or a dementia-related disorder;
(2) An intellectual disability;
(3) A brain injury;
(4) Other physical, mental, or emotional disabilities that are not related to
substance abuse; or
(5) Any combination of such conditions.
4. Before July 1, 2027, the department of public safety, in cooperation with the
Missouri state highway patrol, department of transportation, department of mental
health, local developmental disability resource boards, the state lottery, and local law
enforcement agencies shall:
(1) Develop a training program and alert system for missing persons who have
developmental disabilities that is compatible with existing alert systems in the state. The
training program shall implement crisis intervention team training to equip law
enforcement officers with the skills necessary to understand developmental disabilities,
to de-escalate interactions with persons in crisis, to facilitate appropriate interventions,

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 6
and to respond effectively to a reported missing person emergency when the person has
a developmental disability;
(2) Establish policies and procedures for responding to a reported missing
person emergency when the person has a developmental disability. The policies shall, at
a minimum, provide for the following:
(a) Immediate and widespread dissemination of critical information when a
person who has a developmental disability is reported missing;
(b) Enhancement of emergency response teams' competence by informing them
of the unique behaviors and needs of persons with developmental disabilities; and
(c) Measures to increase public awareness and understanding of the risks
associated with developmental disability-related elopement to foster community support
for persons with developmental disabilities; and
(3) Require a law enforcement agency to do the following, at a minimum, upon
receiving a report:
(a) Contact media outlets in the affected area or surrounding jurisdictions;
(b) Inform all on-duty law enforcement officers of the reported missing person
with a developmental disability; and
(c) Communicate the report to all other law enforcement agencies in the counties
surrounding the county in which the report is filed.
5. The department of public safety shall administer and promulgate rules for the
implementation of the alert system established under this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
Section B. The enactment of section 301.287 of this act shall take effect as soon as
technologically possible following the development and maintenance of a modernized,
integrated system for the titling of vehicles, issuance and renewal of vehicle registrations,
issuance and renewal of driver's licenses and identification cards, and perfection and release
of liens and encumbrances on vehicles, to be funded by the motor vehicle administration
technology fund as created in section 301.558. Following the development of the system, the

SS #2 SCS HCS HB 1840 7
director of the department of revenue shall notify the governor, the secretary of state, and the
revisor of statutes, and shall implement the provisions of section 301.287 of this act.
✔